Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-150] Provoking speeches or gestures.
Any person subject to this chapter who uses provoking or reproachful words or
gestures towards any other person subject to this chapter shall be punished as
a court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next